Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2702, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2702. A. The governing body of any incorporated city


or town and the Oklahoma Tax Commission shall enter into contractual


agreements whereby the Tax Commission shall have authority to


assess, to collect and to enforce any taxes or, penalties or


interest thereon, levied by such incorporated city or town, and

Req. No. 746 Page 1


remit the same to such municipality. Said assessment, collection,


and enforcement authority shall apply to any taxes, penalty or


interest liability existing at the time of contracting. Upon


contracting, the Tax Commission shall have all the powers of


enforcement in regard to such taxes, penalties and interest as are


granted to or vested in the contracting municipality. Such


agreement shall provide for the assessment, collection, enforcement,


and prosecution of such municipal tax, penalties and interest, in


the same manner as and in accordance with the administration,


collection, enforcement, and prosecution by the Tax Commission of


any similar state tax except as provided by agreement. Such


agreement shall authorize the Tax Commission to retain an amount not


to exceed one-half of one percent (0.5%) as a retention fee of


municipal tax collected for services rendered in connection with


such collections; provided, if a municipality files an action


resulting in collection of delinquent state and municipal taxes, the


Tax Commission shall remit one-half (1/2) of the retention fee


applied to the amount of such taxes to the municipality to be


apportioned as are other sales tax revenue. All funds retained by


the Tax Commission for the collection services to municipalities


shall be deposited in the Oklahoma Tax Commission Revolving Fund in


the State Treasury. The municipality shall agree to refrain from


any assessment, collection, or enforcement of the municipal tax



Req. No. 746 Page 2


except as specified in an agreement made pursuant to subsections A,


C, D and E of this section.


B. The Except as provided for in Section 2 of this act, the Tax


Commission shall place all sales taxes, including penalties and


interest, collected on behalf of a municipality pursuant to the


provisions of this section and all use taxes, including penalties


and interest, collected on behalf of a municipality pursuant to the


provisions of Section 1411 of this title in the Sales Tax Remitting


Account as provided in Section 1373 of this title.


C. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection E of this


section, the Tax Commission and the governing body of any


incorporated city or town may enter into contractual agreements


whereby the municipality would be authorized to implement or augment


the enforcement, collection and prosecution of the municipal tax in


those contracting municipalities and to provide for the satisfaction


of refunds or credits to taxpayers. Such agreements shall and are


hereby authorized to provide that the municipality and the Tax


Commission may exchange necessary information to effectively carry


out the terms of such agreements. The municipality, its officers


and employees shall preserve the confidentiality of such information


in the same manner and be subject to the same penalties as provided


by Section 205 of this title, provided that the municipal prosecutor


and other municipal enforcement personnel may receive all



Req. No. 746 Page 3


information necessary to implement or augment the enforcement and


prosecution of municipal sales tax ordinances.


D. Provided further that, upon the request of any incorporated


city or town, the Tax Commission shall enter into contractual


agreements with such municipality whereby the municipality would be


authorized to implement or augment the enforcement, either directly


or through contract with private auditors or audit firms, of the


municipal tax. Any person performing an audit shall first be


approved by the Tax Commission and, once approved, shall be


appointed as an agent of the Tax Commission for purposes of the


audit. Contracts with a private auditor or audit firm shall not be


subject to the limitations of Section 262 of this title and shall


and are hereby authorized to provide that the municipality, private


auditors or audit firms and the Tax Commission may exchange


necessary information to effectively carry out the terms of such


agreements. The municipality, its officers and employees and


private auditors or audit firms may receive all information


necessary to perform audits and shall preserve the confidentiality


of such information in the same manner and be subject to the same


penalties as provided by Section 205 of this title. Municipalities


conducting audits directly or by contracting for private auditors or


audit firms pursuant to this subsection shall furnish to the Tax


Commission the audit results and all relevant supporting


documentation. Further, such municipalities shall provide for the

Req. No. 746 Page 4


payment of private auditors or audit firms by deduction from the tax


assessment resulting from the audit conducted by said private


auditors or audit firms unless a municipality contracts with the


auditor or audit firm for another method of payment. Any municipal


sales tax funds recovered as a result of the services provided under


this subsection will not be included in calculating the retention


fee retained by the Tax Commission pursuant to subsection A of this


section. The contracts authorized by subsection A of this section


shall provide that the Tax Commission shall not have any obligations


thereunder to any municipality that does not participate in an audit


conducted under this subsection.


E. 1. Pursuant to the provisions of this subsection, upon the


request of any municipality, the Tax Commission shall enter into a


contractual agreement with the municipality whereby the municipality


would be authorized to engage in compliance activities, either


directly or through contract with private persons or entities, to


augment the collection of the municipal tax by the Tax Commission.


The sole responsibility for the administration of any and all such


compliance activities shall remain with the Tax Commission to ensure


that sellers and purchasers shall only be required to register, file


returns, and remit state and local taxes to one single authority,


and that no enforcement activities are duplicated.


2. Any contractual agreement entered into pursuant to paragraph


of this subsection and any person or entity who will be performing

Req. No. 746 Page 5


compliance activities shall first be approved by the Tax Commission


in its sole discretion. Once approved, the private person or entity


shall be appointed as an agent of the Tax Commission for purposes of


such compliance activities. Any agreements entered into pursuant to


paragraph 1 of this subsection shall provide that the municipality,


private persons or entities appointed as an agent and the Tax


Commission may exchange necessary information to effectively carry


out the terms of the agreements. The municipality, its officers and


employees and any private person or entity appointed as an agent of


the Tax Commission may receive all information necessary for


compliance activities and shall preserve the confidentiality of the


information in the same manner and be subject to the same penalties


as provided by Section 205 of this title. Municipalities conducting


compliance activities directly or by contracting with private


persons or entities pursuant to this subsection shall furnish to the


Tax Commission the compliance results and all relevant supporting


documentation and the Tax Commission shall take such information and


issue proposed assessments or conduct other such administrative


action as is necessary.


3. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving


fund for the Oklahoma Tax Commission to be known as the “Tax


Commission Compliance Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund,


not subject to fiscal year limitations, and notwithstanding any


other provisions of law, shall consist of the first three-fourths of

Req. No. 746 Page 6


one percent (3/4 of 1%) of enhanced collections of state sales and


use taxes collected pursuant to an agreement entered into pursuant


to paragraph 1 of this subsection. All monies accruing to the


credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and


expended by the Oklahoma Tax Commission for the purpose of


reimbursing a municipality for enhanced collections of state sales


taxes pursuant to an agreement entered into pursuant to paragraph 1


of this subsection. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon


warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as


prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services for approval and payment.


4. The Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services shall form an Implementation Working Group composed of


representatives of municipalities and of the Tax Commission and


shall adopt a plan to implement this subsection by September 30,


2011. The plan shall ensure that the Tax Commission shall maintain


a central point of collection and centralized administration and


enforcement and further shall be consistent with all applicable


state laws.


F. Any Except as provided for in Section 2 of this act, any sum


or sums collected or required to be collected pursuant to a


municipal sales tax levy shall be deemed to be held in trust for the


municipality, and, as trustee, the collecting vendor shall have a



Req. No. 746 Page 7


fiduciary duty to the municipality in regards to such sums and shall


be subject to the trust laws of this state.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2702.2 of Title 68, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “sanctuary city” means a city with


any ordinance or directive to impede or limit cooperation with the


federal government in the enforcement of immigration law or any


ordinance or directive to aid or abet any individual in furtherance


of violating immigration law.


B. The Attorney General may determine if a municipality is


obstructing the federal government from the enforcement of


immigration law, knowingly aiding or abetting any individual in


furtherance of a violation of any immigration law, or declaring


itself a sanctuary city.


C. The determination shall be based on an investigation by the


Attorney General or information provided to the Attorney General by


federal departments, federal law enforcement agencies, or state or


local law enforcement agencies.


D. If a determination is made pursuant to subsection B of this


section, the Attorney General shall notify the Oklahoma Tax


Commission. If the Attorney General determines that such


municipality is no longer taking any actions described in subsection


B of this section, the Attorney General shall notify the Commission.

Req. No. 746 Page 8


If a determination is made that a municipality took any action


described in subsection B of this section, and the municipality has


an agreement with the Oklahoma Tax Commission for the collection and


enforcement of tax levies pursuant to the provisions of Section 2702


or 2702.1 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the Commission shall


place all sales and lodging taxes, including penalties and interest,


collected on behalf of the municipality in an agency special account


designated for this purpose. The Commission shall continue to place


all collections in the special account until notified by the


Attorney General that the municipality is no longer taking any


action described in subsection B of this section. Upon such


notification, the Commission shall allocate all collections as


prescribed by Sections 2702 and 2702.1 of Title 68 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-746 QD 1/16/2025 3:54:56 PM















Req. No. 746 Page 9